Ohio, session 136, HB351.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. (A) There is hereby established the Ohio Task 2
Force on Gun Violence. The Task Force shall consist of the 3
following members: 4
(1) The Governor or the Governor's designee; 5
(2) The Attorney General or the Attorney General's 6
designee; 7
(3) The Executive Director of the Commission on Minority 8
Health or the Executive Director's designee; 9
(4) The Director of Children and Youth or the Director's 10
designee; 11
(5) The Chief Justice of the Ohio Supreme Court or the 12
Chief Justice's designee; 13
(6) Three members of the House of Representatives, two 14
from the majority party and one from the minority party, all 15

H. B. No. 351 Page 2
As Introduced
appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; 16
(7) Three members of the Senate, two from the majority 17
party and one from the minority party, all appointed by the 18
Senate President; 19
(8) Two members of the community who work to reduce gun 20
violence, one appointed by the Speaker of the House of 21
Representatives and one appointed by the Senate President. 22
(B) Not later than thirty days after the effective date of 23
this section, the Task Force shall meet to select from its 24
members a chairperson or co-chairpersons. Thereafter, the Task 25
Force shall meet at the call of the chairperson or either co- 26
chairperson, but not less than monthly. 27
(C) Members of the Task Force shall serve without 28
compensation except to the extent that serving on the Task Force 29
is considered part of the member's regular duties of employment. 30
(D) The Task Force shall examine all of the following: 31
(1) The prevalence of gun violence within communities 32
across this state; 33
(2) Existing evidence-based programs that help reduce gun 34
violence; 35
(3) Best practices that are available to reduce gun 36
violence; 37
(4) Community revitalization efforts that can be 38
implemented to prevent gun violence; 39
(5) Criminal justice solutions to reduce gun violence in 40
communities; 41
(6) Social determinants of health that can be addressed to 42

H. B. No. 351 Page 3
As Introduced
assist victims of gun violence. 43
(E) Not later than one year after the effective date of 44
this section, the Task Force shall prepare a report detailing 45
its findings and recommendations. The report shall be submitted 46
to the General Assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the 47
Revised Code. Upon submission of this report, the Task Force 48
shall cease to exist. 49